Arkansas, session 2025, HB1415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-13-112(a), concerning inquiries for fire
investigations, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) When the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police or
any officer or deputy has reason to believe that a crime or other offense has
been committed in connection with any fire, the director or his or her deputy
may conduct an inquiry in relation thereto.
(2) A municipal law enforcement officer or a county law
enforcement officer shall respond to a request by a fire official to
determine if a fire investigation is needed.

/s/L. Johnson







*SSS039*
03-31-2025 11:19:07 SSS039